src/twol-kom.txt
Alphabet
а б в г д е ё ж з и і й к к6:к л л6:л м н о ӧ 
п р с т у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я
#:0 %- %_:0 Z1:0 ;

Diacritics
 %+ ;

Sets

! All Consonants
C1 = б в г д ж з й к л м н п р с т ф х ц ч ш щ ;

! All Consonants followed by primary Cyrillic vowels
C2 = б в г ж й к м п ф х ч ш щ ;

! Vowels
V1 = ӧ ы а я о ё у ю и і е э ;

! Marks
M1 = ъ ь ;

! Letter
Segm = C1 V1 M1 ;

! Word Boundary ("-" in hyphenated tokens, "_" in tokens written with white-space joiner)
WB = # %- %_ ;

Rules

"л:в"
   л:в <=> V1 _ [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"м:0"
  м:0  <=> н _  [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"к:0"
  к:0 <=> [с| ш| с ь| ч] _  [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"т:0"
  т:0 <=> п _  [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"ы:0"
  ы:0  <=> V1:+ C1:* _ %+: V1: ;

"л:0"
  л:0 <=> л _ ь [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"д:0"
  д:0 <=> д _ [ь|з] [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;

"ъяс:ьяс"
  ъ:ь <=> [д: з| ч] %+: _ я с ;

"ъяс:яс"
  ъ:0 <=> [V1 (й:)|ь] %+: _ я с ;

"ь+а:00я, й+а:ъ0я etc. (1)"
  X:Y <=> [\[:з|:ч]| \:д :з] [ь: | й:] V1:0* %+: _ ;
           where X in (а о у)
                 Y in (я ё ю) matched ;

"ь+а:00я etc. (2)"
  ь:0 <=> [б|в|г|д|ж|з|к|л|м|н|п|р|с|т|ф|х|ц|ч|ш|щ] _ V1:0* %+: [а:|о:|у:|і:] ;

"й+а:ъ0я etc. (2)"
  й:ъ <=> [C1 - й] _ V1:0* %+: [а:|о:|у:] ;

!!Also "й:0" 2009-10-09
!
"й+а:00я etc. (2)"
  й:0 <=> V1 _ V1:0* %+: [а:|о:|у:] ;
          [б|в|г|д|ж|з|к|м|н|п|р|т] _  [WB: |Z1: | %+: [C1:|ъ:]] ;


"і:и"
  і:и <=> [V1|C2|ь:|:д з] :0* %+: _ ;
